Illinois, session 104th, HB2859.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Section 6-9.1 as follows: 6    (235 ILCS 5/6-9.1)7    Sec. 6-9.1. Deliveries to retail establishments. 8    (a) A distributor of wine or spirits shall deliver to any 9retailer within any geographic area in which that distributor 10has been granted by a wholesaler the right to sell its 11trademark, brand, or name at least once every 2 weeks if (i) in 12the case of a retailer located in a county with a population of 13at least 3,000,000 inhabitants or in a county adjacent to a 14county with at least 3,000,000 inhabitants, the retailer 15agrees to purchase at least $200 of wine or spirits from the 16distributor every 2 weeks; or (ii) in the case of a retailer 17located in a county with a population of less than 3,000,000 18that is not adjacent to a county with a population of at least 193,000,000 inhabitants, the retailer agrees to purchase at 20least $50 of wine or spirits from the distributor every 2 21weeks.22    (b) On January 1, 2002 and every 2 years thereafter, the 23dollar amount amounts in items (i) and (ii) of subsection (a)   HB2859- 2 -LRB104 10894 RPS 20976 b1shall be increased or decreased by a percentage equal to the 2percentage increase or decrease in the Consumer Price Index 3during the previous 2 years according to the most recent 4available data.5    (c) Any brewer or non-resident dealer which holds 6self-distribution privileges pursuant to a class 1 brewer 7license or a class 3 brewer license under this Act shall 8deliver beer to any retailer in the brewer's wholly owned or 9leased vehicles or through a freight forwarding service, 10excluding common carriers such as Federal Express, United 11Parcel Service, or similar common carriers, and shall provide 12services to the retailer upon the request of the retailer if 13such services are permitted under this Act and the rules of the 14Commission. 15(Source: P.A. 102-442, eff. 8-20-21.)